Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.270

Duplication of names—Conspiracy—Criminal and civil liability.

Any person who with intent to mislead or confuse the electors conspires with another person who has a surname similar to an incumbent seeking reelection to the same office, or to an opponent for the same office whose political reputation has been well established, by persuading such other person to file for such office with no intention of being elected, but to defeat the incumbent or the well-known opponent, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW. In addition, all conspirators are subject to a suit for civil damages, the amount of which may not exceed the salary that the injured person would have received had he or she been elected or reelected.

[ 2004 c 266 s 20. Prior: 2003 c 111 s 2115; 2003 c 53 s 178; 1965 c 9 s 29.18.080; prior: 1943 c 198 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5213-15. Formerly RCW 29.15.110, 29.18.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.